Hawaii statutes.
§40-7 Count of money and securities in
treasury. The comptroller with the aid of the staff of the director of
taxation and the director of finance shall count the money and securities in
the state treasury once in each fiscal year, or such other times as the
comptroller may deem necessary, provided that the scope of the examination
shall be determined by the comptroller who shall use such auditing procedures
as the comptroller deems necessary.

The comptroller shall prepare, in triplicate,
statements showing:

(1) The amount of money actually in the treasury
reconciled with the amount of money as shown by the comptroller's record.

(2) The amount of securities owned by the State in
the treasury reconciled with the amount of securities as shown by the comptroller's
records.

(3) The amount of the depository securities actually
in the treasury as compared with the amount of cash deposited in the respective
banks (depositories) provided that the sufficiency of these deposits shall not
be made a part of the examination. [L 1927, c 219, pt of §16; RL 1935, §597; am
L 1941, c 86, §1; RL 1945, §1601; RL 1955, §34-51; am L 1957, c 152, §1; am L
1959, c 145, §2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§14, 16; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS
§40-7; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Cited: 36 H. 369, 380.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next